Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-2715
Use of custodial property.

(1) A custodian may deliver or pay to the minor or expend for the minor's benefit so much of the custodial property as the custodian considers advisable for the use and benefit of the minor without court order and without regard to (a) the duty or ability of the custodian personally or of any other person to support the minor or (b) any other income or property of the minor which may be applicable or available for that purpose.

(2) On petition of an interested person or the minor if the minor has attained the age of fourteen years, the court may order the custodian to deliver or pay to the minor or expend for the minor's benefit so much of the custodial property as the court considers advisable for the use and benefit of the minor.

(3) A delivery, payment, or expenditure under this section is in addition to, not in substitution for, and does not affect any obligation of a person to support the minor.

Laws 1992, LB 907, § 15.